Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3493.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CONTRIBUTIONS FOR ELIGIBLE EMPLOYEE.new text end new text begin (a) Pursuant to Minnesota Statutes, section 353.27, subdivision 12b, Alaine Pappin and Independent School District No. 281, Robbinsdale, on behalf of Alaine Pappin, must make contributions as calculated under paragraph (d) for service as an eligible employee prior to July 1, 1989, which was previously unreported. new text end new text begin (b) The contributions described in paragraph (a) are permitted although Alaine Pappin was not enrolled as a member in a public pension plan at the time the service was provided. new text end new text begin (c) The contributions described in paragraph (a) are sufficient to retroactively establish Alaine Pappin's membership in a public pension fund listed in section 356.30, subdivision 3, and eligibility for an unreduced early retirement benefit under section 354.44. new text end new text begin (d) The Public Employees Retirement Association must calculate the amount of the contributions required under section 353.27, subdivision 12b, plus interest, based on the omitted salary of $3,185. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end